Arkansas, session 2025, HB1793.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2401 is amended to read as follows:
6-18-2401. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) It is the responsibility of each school district in Arkansas
to ensure the safety of all students and school personnel;
(2) It is the responsibility of each school district in Arkansas
to ensure that every student in Arkansas is safe and protected from being
unnecessarily or inappropriately restrained;
(3) Safe, effective, evidence-based strategies should be the
basis for protocols in public schools and educational settings to support
every student who displays challenging behavior in a public school or
educational setting;
(4) Providing school personnel with training that is focused on
evidence-based positive behavioral support behavioral intervention, de-
escalation techniques, and physical restraint prevention can reduce the
incidence of injury, trauma, and death;
*TNL063*
03/13/2025 11:20:25 AM TNL063

HB1793
(5) The effective implementation of school-wide positive
behavioral support is linked to greater academic achievement, significantly
fewer disciplinary problems, increased instruction time, and the perception
of a safer teaching environment by school personnel;
(6) Positive behavioral support involves school-wide approaches
that result in:
(A) Positive classroom and school climates;
(B) Prosocial student and school personnel interactions;
(C) Teaching a student academic, social, emotional,
behavioral engagement, and achievement skills; and
(D) Reinforcing the academic, social, emotional,
behavioral engagement, and achievement skills of a student;
(7) The use of effective positive behavioral support in public
schools and educational settings can prevent an emergency situation that
requires the use of physical restraint on a student; and
(8)(5) Every effort should be made to:
(A) Prevent the need for secluding a student or using a
physical restraint on a student;
(B) Ensure that behavioral intervention is consistent with
the right of a student to be free from abuse and treated with dignity;
(C) Avoid the use of physical restraint on a student to
the greatest extent possible without endangering the safety of other students
and school personnel;
(D) Avoid the use of a physical restraint on a student
except in a situation where the behavior of the student poses an imminent
danger of serious physical harm to the student or others;
(E) Discontinue the use of a physical restraint on a
student as soon as the imminent danger of serious physical harm to the
student or others dissipates; and
(F) Refrain from using chemical restraint or mechanical
restraint in a public school or educational setting; and
(6) It is the responsibility of each school district to
determine how to effectively discipline enrolled students based on evidence-
based behavioral intervention strategies and the needs of its student
population and members of school personnel.

03/13/2025 11:20:25 AM TNL063

HB1793
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2402(c), concerning requirements of
school districts as they relate to student restraints in public schools and
educational settings, is amended to read as follows:
(c) Each school district shall:
(1) Adopt policies and procedures that are consistent with the
provisions of this subchapter and appropriate based on the needs of the
school district's student population and members of school personnel;
(2) Review the Department of Education Special Education and
Related Services Guidelines, § 20.00 Time-Out Seclusion Room; and
(3) Provide its school personnel with the training, tools, and
support needed to ensure the safety of all students and school personnel.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2403(22), concerning the definition of
"positive behavioral support" as it relates to the use of physical restraints
on students in public schools and educational settings, is repealed.
(22) “Positive behavioral support” means the application of
behavior analysis that:
(A) Is used to achieve socially important behavior change;
(B) Occurs at the:
(i) Prevention level for all students in a school;
(ii) Strategic intervention level for a student who
is not responding, from a social-emotional and behavioral perspective, to the
prevention level; and
(iii) Intensive service or crisis-management level
for a student who needs multifaceted or comprehensive behavioral or mental
health services; and
(C) Involves a planned and collaborative school-wide
approach that is implemented with a goal:
(i) Of establishing a positive and supportive school
environment that:
(a) Teaches and reinforces prosocial behavior
in a student;
(b) Holds a student positively accountable for
meeting an established behavioral expectation; and
(c) Maintains a level of consistency
throughout the implementation process; and
03/13/2025 11:20:25 AM TNL063

HB1793
(ii) That is accomplished by using positive
behavioral programs, strategies, or approaches;

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2403(24), concerning the definition of
"punishment" as it relates to the use of physical restraints on students in
public schools and educational settings, is amended to read as follows:
(24) “Punishment” means an action that:
(A) May follow an inappropriate behavior of a student; and
(B) Is taken with the goal of decreasing, stopping, or
eliminating the future reoccurrence of the inappropriate behavior of the
student; and
(C) Is not taken with the goal of replacing the
inappropriate behavior of the student with future appropriate behavior by the
student;

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2404 is amended to read as follows:
6-18-2404. Prevention Multi-tiered system of supports.
(a) School districts shall implement positive behavioral supports that
shall be used at the:
(1) Prevention level for each student in a school;
(2) Strategic intervention level for a student who is not
responding, from a social, emotional, or behavioral perspective, to the
prevention level; and
(3) Intensive service or crisis-management level for a student
who needs multifaceted or comprehensive behavioral or mental health services.
(b) Positive behavioral support implemented by a school district shall
include:
(1) The teaching and reinforcing of interpersonal, social,
problem solving, conflict resolution, and coping skills to a student;
(2) Holding a student positively accountable for meeting an
established behavioral expectation;
(3) Maintaining a high level of consistency through the
implementation process; and
(4) The following interrelated activities:
(A) Providing a school-wide approach to the discipline and
safety of each student rather than an approach to only the behavior problem
03/13/2025 11:20:25 AM TNL063

HB1793
of a student;
(B) Focusing on preventing the development and occurrence
of problem behavior;
(C) Regularly reviewing behavior data to adapt the
procedures of a school to meet the needs of every student; and
(D) Providing a multitiered approach to academic and
behavioral services and support to meet the academic and behavioral
achievement needs of each student.
(c) A positive behavioral support system and conflict resolution or
de-escalation approach implemented by a school district shall be based on the
following principles:
(1) A school should promote the right of a student to be treated
with dignity;
(2) A student should receive necessary academic, social,
emotional, and behavioral support that is provided in a safe and least-
restrictive environment possible;
(3) Positive and appropriate academic, social, emotional, or
behavioral intervention, as well as mental health support, should be provided
routinely to each student who needs the intervention or support;
(4) School personnel should be trained to provide routinely
positive and appropriate academic, social, emotional, or behavioral
intervention, as well as mental health support, to each student who needs the
intervention or support;
(5) Behavioral intervention should emphasize prevention and
should be a part of a school's system of positive behavioral support;
(6) A school should have the school personnel necessary to
effectively provide positive support to a student;
(7) A school should appropriately train its school personnel to
be able to address the needs of each student;
(8) All relevant school personnel, as determined by each public
school district, should receive training in:
(A) The use of positive behavioral support for student
behavior and in preventive techniques for teaching and motivating prosocial
student behavior; and
(B) Conflict de-escalation and resolution techniques, and
these techniques should be employed by all school personnel to prevent,
03/13/2025 11:20:25 AM TNL063

HB1793
defuse, evaluate, and debrief a crisis and conflict situation; and
(9) Each student who exhibits an ongoing behavior that
interferes with his or her learning or the learning of others, and who is
nonresponsive to effectively implemented classroom or administrative
intervention, should receive additional intensive behavioral intervention
that is based on a functional behavior assessment and data-based problem
solving.
(d)(1) A (a) Each public school shall establish a problem-solving and
intervention team within its multi-tiered system of supports behavioral
interventions for each student who exhibits social, emotional, or behavioral
difficulty that may escalate, if not addressed, to potentially dangerous
behavior.
(2)(b) A problem-solving and intervention team multi-tiered
system of supports shall include a team member members who is an are academic
and behavioral assessment and intervention professional professionals.
(3)(c) A problem-solving and intervention team Professionals
included in a multi-tiered system of supports shall:
(A)(1) Work with the teachers of a student to complete:
(i)(A) A functional behavior assessment of the
student; and
(ii)(B) An assessment of any problematic situations
involving the student; and
(B)(2) Consider the need for a behavior intervention plan
with the goal of preventing or resolving the social, emotional, or behavioral
difficulty of the student and developing a response that will de-escalate and
stabilize a potential emergency situation that approaches the danger level.
(4)(d) If a student is suspected of having a disability that
relates to behavioral concerns, the school shall follow school district,
state, and federal special education procedures.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2407(3)(C)(iii), concerning the
purpose of a debriefing meeting that occurs after an incident involving the
physical restraint of a student, is amended to read as follows:
(iii) Evaluate the school district's positive
behavioral support system behavioral intervention procedures and prevention
techniques in order to minimize future use of physical restraint.
03/13/2025 11:20:25 AM TNL063

HB1793

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2407(3)(D)(iii), concerning the
requirements of members of school personnel during a debriefing meeting that
is conducted after an incident involving the physical restraint of a student,
is amended to read as follows:
(iii) Discuss whether positive behavioral support
was behavioral intervention procedures adopted by the school district were
appropriately implemented;

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2408(a)(1), concerning optional
training conducted by a school district for members of school personnel, is
amended to read as follows:
(1) Training on the use of an array of positive behavior
interventions, if the school district utilizes positive behavior
interventions, behavioral intervention procedures, strategies, and supports
to increase appropriate student behavior and decrease inappropriate or
dangerous student behavior;

SECTION 9. The introductory language to Arkansas Code § 6-18-2409(2),
concerning training provided to school personnel regarding positive
behavioral support, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Provide evidence-based skills training relating to positive
support, conflict prevention, de-escalation, and crisis response techniques,
including without limitation:












03/13/2025 11:20:25 AM TNL063